Tennessee, session 114, SB1225.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-411(a), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting instead:
(a) A person who disseminates smoking paraphernalia shall prominently display
in the place where the items are disseminated the sign required pursuant to § 39-17-
1506(a).
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1225
003358
- 1 -